Maryland, session 2026, SB0773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
12–508.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, a pharmacist may order
[and] A VACCINATION FOR OR administer a vaccination to an individual who is at least 3
years old if:
(i) The vaccine is:
1. An influenza vaccine;
2. A COVID–19 vaccine; or
3. Used in response to a public health emergency;
(ii) The pharmacist has completed a practical training program of at
least 20 hours that is approved by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education and
includes:
1. Hands–on injection techniques;
2. Clinical evaluation of indications and contraindications of
vaccines; and
– 1 –

Ch. 269 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. The recognition and treatment of emergency reactions to
vaccines;
(iii) The pharmacist has a current certificate in basic
cardiopulmonary resuscitation;
(iv) The pharmacist has completed a minimum of 2 hours of
continuing pharmaceutical education related to immunizations that is approved by the
Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education as part of the license renewal requirements
under § 12–309 of this title;
(v) The pharmacist complies with the record–keeping and reporting
requirements in paragraph (5) of this subsection and any corresponding regulations
adopted by the Board; and
(vi) If the vaccination is administered to an individual under the age
of 18 years, OR ORDERED FOR ADMINISTRATION BY AN ADULT CAREGIVER TO AN
INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS, the pharmacist informs the child vaccination
patient and adult caregiver who is accompanying the child of the importance of well–child
visits with a pediatric primary care provider and refers the patient to a pediatric primary
care provider when appropriate.
(2) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, a pharmacist who has met
the requirement of paragraph (1)(ii) through (vi) of this subsection may administer to an
individual who is at least 7 years old a vaccination that is:
(i) Recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices; or
(ii) Approved or authorized by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, a pharmacist who has met
the requirement of paragraph (1)(ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection may administer to an
adult a vaccination that is recommended in the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s Health Information for International Travel.
(4) (i) A pharmacist shall ORDER OR administer a vaccination under
paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection under a written protocol that:
1. Is vaccine specific; and
2. Meets criteria established by the Department, in
consultation with the Board, the Board of Physicians, and the Board of Nursing, in
regulation.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 269
(ii) The recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices cited in this section refer to
federal statutes, rules, and guidance in effect:
1. On December 31, 2024; or
2. At a later date to account for any new vaccines
recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s Advisory Committee on
Immunization Practices after December 31, 2024.
(5) A pharmacist shall:
(i) Report all vaccinations administered OR ORDERED by the
pharmacist to the ImmuNet Program established under § 18–109 of the Health – General
Article;
(ii) If the vaccination has been administered in accordance with a
prescription, document at least one effort to inform the individual’s authorized prescriber
that the vaccination has been administered; and
(iii) Except for an influenza vaccination administered under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, if the authorized prescriber is not the individual’s primary
care provider or if the vaccination has not been administered in accordance with a
prescription, document at least one effort to inform the individual’s primary care provider
or other usual source of care that the vaccination has been administered.
(b) The Board shall:
(1) Set reasonable fees for the administration of vaccinations under this
section; and
(2) Adopt regulations that require a pharmacist to submit a registration
form to the Board that includes verification that the pharmacist:
(i) Has successfully completed a certification course approved by the
Board that included instruction in the guidelines and recommendations of the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention regarding vaccinations in effect on December 31, 2024; and
(ii) Is certified in basic cardiopulmonary resuscitation and obtained
the certification through in–person classroom instruction.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –